Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.023

Chronic care management program—Uniform medical plan—Definitions.

(1) The health care authority, in collaboration with the department of health, shall design and implement a chronic care management program for employees and school employees enrolled in the state's self-insured uniform medical plan. Programs must be evidence based, facilitating the use of information technology to improve quality of care and must improve coordination of primary, acute, and long-term care for those enrollees with multiple chronic conditions. The authority shall consider expansion of existing medical home and chronic care management programs. The authority shall use best practices in identifying those employees and school employees best served under a chronic care management model using predictive modeling through claims or other health risk information.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Medical home" means a site of care that provides comprehensive preventive and coordinated care centered on the patient needs and assures high quality, accessible, and efficient care.

(b) "Chronic care management" means the authority's program that provides care management and coordination activities for health plan enrollees determined to be at risk for high medical costs. "Chronic care management" provides education and training and/or coordination that assist program participants in improving self-management skills to improve health outcomes and reduce medical costs by educating clients to better utilize services.

[ 2018 c 260 s 8; 2007 c 259 s 6.]

NOTES:

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.